District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.42a

Repealed

Eligibility for General Public Assistance.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 542a
as added Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-19, title I, § 101(f), 38 DCR 4066
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-27, § 2(f), 38 DCR 4205
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 10(d), 40 DCR 6311
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(m), 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 3-205.42a.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(m) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 701(m) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.